Utah statutes.
58-17b-601.   General operating standards.

(1) (a)  The division shall make rules relating to the operations and conduct of facilities, individuals, and entities which are regulated under this chapter, to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.

(b)  The rules shall be consistent with the regulations of the Federal Food and Drug Administration and Drug Enforcement Administration, this chapter, and all other laws relating to activities and persons regulated under this chapter.

(2) (a)  This chapter does not prevent, restrict, or in any other manner interfere with the sale of nonprescription drugs.

(b)  The division may not make any rules under this chapter that require nonprescription drugs to be sold by a licensed pharmacist or only in a pharmaceutical facility.

(c)  The sale or distribution of nonprescription drugs does not constitute the practice of pharmacy.

